Maryland, session 2026, HB0088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–128.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(I) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND DEVICES UNDER INDIVIDUAL,
GROUP, OR BLANKET HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS THAT ARE
ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0088*

HOUSE BILL 88
(II) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND DEVICES UNDER INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(2) AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS AND DEVICES THROUGH A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER IS SUBJECT TO
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY JOIN A BULK PURCHASING
POOL FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.